apertium-hun.hun.dix
    <pardef n="úrnő__n">
        <e><p><l>ő</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>őt</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>őnek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>őben</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>őhöz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>őbe</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>őnél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>őn</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>őnél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ővel</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>je</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jük</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="id/ő__n">
        <e><p><l>ő</l><r>ő<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>őt</l><r>ő<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>őnek</l><r>ő<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>őben</l><r>ő<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>őhöz</l><r>ő<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>őbe</l><r>ő<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>őnél</l><r>ő<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>őn</l><r>ő<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>őnél</l><r>ő<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ővel</l><r>ő<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>eje</l><r>ő<s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>őnk</l><r>ő<s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejük</l><r>ő<s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="cipő__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ben</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>höz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>vel</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>je</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jük</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
        <pardef n="bébi__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ben</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hez</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>vel</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>je</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jük</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- ú u -->
    <pardef n="fi/ú__n">
        <e><p><l>ú</l><r>ú<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>út</l><r>ú<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>úk</l><r>ú<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>úval</l><r>ú<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>úban</l><r>ú<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>úhoz</l><r>ú<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>úba</l><r>ú<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>únál</l><r>ú<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ún</l><r>ú<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>am</l><r>ú<s n="n"/><s n="px1ss"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- a á -->
    <pardef n="macsk/a__n">
        <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>át</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ának</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ával</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ában</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ához</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ába</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ánál</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>án</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ája</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bék/e__n">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ét</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ének</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ével</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ében</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>éhez</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ébe</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>énél</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>én</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>éje</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="any/a__n">
        <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>át</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ának</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ával</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ában</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ához</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ába</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ánál</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>án</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ja</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="px3ss"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>jának</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="px3ss"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>jára</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="px3ss"/><s n="sg"/><s n="sub"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>juk</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="akusztika"><i>akusztik</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="albérlő"><i>albérlő</i><par n="cipő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="állólámpa"><i>állólámp</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alufólia"><i>alufóli</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anya"><i>any</i><par n="any/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apa"><i>ap</i><par n="any/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apátia"><i>apáti</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ápolónő"><i>ápolónő</i><par n="cipő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ária"><i>ári</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aromaterápia"><i>aromaterápi</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="artéria"><i>artéri</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asztma"><i>asztm</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baba"><i>bab</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ballada"><i>ballad</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="banda"><i>band</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barátnő"><i>barátnő</i><par n="cipő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barázda"><i>barázd</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bébi"><i>bébi</i><par n="bébi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="befektető"><i>befektető</i><par n="cipő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="begónia"><i>begóni</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="béke"><i>bék</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bélyegző"><i>bélyegző</i><par n="cipő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bérlő"><i>bérlő</i><par n="cipő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bicikli"><i>bicikli</i><par n="bébi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="billentyű"><i>billentyű</i><par n="cipő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="biológia"><i>biológi</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bolha"><i>bolh</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="borotva"><i>borotv</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bögre"><i>bögr</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bölcső"><i>bölcső</i><par n="cipő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="böngésző"><i>böngésző</i><par n="cipő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="burgonya"><i>burgony</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="büfé"><i>büfé</i><par n="bébi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bűnöző"><i>bűnöző</i><par n="cipő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cékla"><i>cékl</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cigaretta"><i>cigarett</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="címke"><i>címk</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cinke"><i>cink</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cipő"><i>cipő</i><par n="cipő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csata"><i>csat</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csatamező"><i>csatamező</i><par n="cipő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csecsemő"><i>csecsemő</i><par n="cipő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csengő"><i>csengő</i><par n="cipő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csere"><i>cser</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csipke"><i>csipk</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csípő"><i>csípő</i><par n="cipő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csirke"><i>csirk</i><par n="bék/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csizma"><i>csizm</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csúszda"><i>csúszd</i><par n="macsk/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiú"><i>fi</i><par n="fi/ú__n"/></e>
    <e lm="idő"><i>id</i><par n="id/ő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kisfiú"><i>kisfi</i><par n="fi/ú__n"/></e>
    <e lm="árjelző"><p><l>árjelző</l><r>árjelző</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="birkalegelő"><p><l>birkalegelő</l><r>birkalegelő</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csuklóvédő"><p><l>csuklóvédő</l><r>csuklóvédő</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="előrejelző"><p><l>előrejelző</l><r>előrejelző</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fejtörő"><p><l>fejtörő</l><r>fejtörő</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="főmenü"><p><l>főmenü</l><r>főmenü</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hangvevő"><p><l>hangvevő</l><r>hangvevő</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jogásznő"><p><l>jogásznő</l><r>jogásznő</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="költőnő"><p><l>költőnő</l><r>költőnő</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="művésznő"><p><l>művésznő</l><r>művésznő</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pólyakötő"><p><l>pólyakötő</l><r>pólyakötő</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="szőlőtő"><p><l>szőlőtő</l><r>szőlőtő</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="útkövező"><p><l>útkövező</l><r>útkövező</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zsúrterítő"><p><l>zsúrterítő</l><r>zsúrterítő</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bögyörő"><p><l>bögyörő</l><r>bögyörő</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="engedményező"><p><l>engedményező</l><r>engedményező</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="főszereplő"><p><l>főszereplő</l><r>főszereplő</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="idegesítő"><p><l>idegesítő</l><r>idegesítő</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kiegészítő"><p><l>kiegészítő</l><r>kiegészítő</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lepedő"><p><l>lepedő</l><r>lepedő</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="őszelő"><p><l>őszelő</l><r>őszelő</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="szentháromságfű"><p><l>szentháromságfű</l><r>szentháromságfű</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tüsző"><p><l>tüsző</l><r>tüsző</r></p><par n="úrnő__n"/></e>
